Georgia, session 2025_26, SB242.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 2 of Article 4 of Chapter 13 of Title 45 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to the Capitol Art Standards Commission, is amended in Code Section 45-13-71,
relating to duties and responsibilities of commission, by adding a new paragraph to read as
follows:
"(5.1) To oversee the design, procurement, and placement of a monument honoring the
Honorable Clarence Thomas pursuant to Code Section 50-3-130;"
S. B. 242
- 1 -

LC 50 1142
SECTION 2.
Chapter 3 of Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to state flag, seal,
and other symbols, is amended by adding a new article to read as follows:
"ARTICLE 8
50-3-130.
(a) Subject to the availability of funds, there shall be placed within the Nathan Deal
Judicial Center a monument honoring the Honorable Clarence Thomas.
(b)(1) Such monument shall be designed, procured, and placed by the Capitol Art
Standards Commission, subject to final approval by a monument committee composed
of the following members of the General Assembly:
(A) Two members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the
House of Representatives;
(B) Two members of the Senate appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; and
(C) One member from each house of the General Assembly appointed by the
Governor.
(2) The monument committee established pursuant to this subsection shall stand
abolished upon placement of such monument.
(c) No public funds shall be expended for the design or procurement of such monument.
Gifts and donations from private individuals, organizations, or foundations shall be
accepted and expended by the Capitol Art Standards Commission to carry out the
requirements of this Code section.
(d) Such monument shall be procured and placed as soon as practicable but not before the
state has been granted any intellectual property license necessary for the purposes of this
Code section."
S. B. 242
- 2 -

LC 50 1142
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 242
- 3 -